Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.905

Consultation with public utilities for water-sewer facility relocation projects.

Cities shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects involving relocation of sewer and/or water facilities, consult with public utilities operating water/sewer systems in order to coordinate design.

[ 2007 c 31 s 5.]